Utah statutes.
67-1a-8.   Form and contents of great seal.
The Great Seal of the State of Utah shall be 2-1/2 inches in diameter, and of
the following device: the center a shield and perched thereon an American
eagle with outstretching wings; the top of the shield pierced by six arrows
crosswise; under the arrows the motto "Industry"; beneath the motto a beehive,
on either side growing sego lilies; below the beehive the figures "1847"; and
on each side of the shield an American flag; encircling all, near the outer
edge of the seal, beginning at the lower left-hand portion, the words "The
Great Seal of the State of Utah," with the figures "1896" at the base.
